Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.125

Health care facility certification—Unfunded federal mandates—Applicant fees.

The federal government requires Washington health care facilities to be certified in order to receive federal health care program reimbursement. The department receives funding from the federal government to perform the certifications and recertifications of these health care facilities. When the federal government does not provide sufficient funding to cover all certifications and recertifications, the secretary may assess fees on certification and recertification applicants to fund the certifications and recertifications.

[ 2007 c 279 s 1.]